tests/normal nouns - ending with n.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-optimised-lookup
      Gen: ../khk.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../khk.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "амьтан = animal":
    амьтан<n><nom> : амьтан
    амьтан<n><acc> : амьтныг
    амьтан<n><gen> : амьтны
    амьтан<n><abl> : амьтнаас
    амьтан<n><dat> : амьтанд
    амьтан<n><pl><nom> : амьтад

 "шашин = religion":
    шашин<n><nom> : шашин
    шашин<n><acc> : шашныг
    шашин<n><gen> : шашны
    шашин<n><abl> : шашнаас
    шашин<n><dat> : шашинд
    шашин<n><pl><nom> : шашнууд

 "хүн = person":
    хүн<n><nom> : хүн
    хүн<n><acc> : хүнийг
    хүн<n><gen> : хүний
    хүн<n><abl> : хүнээс
    хүн<n><dat> : хүнд
    хүн<n><pl><nom> : хүмүүс

 "орон = place":
    орон<n><nom> : орон
    орон<n><acc> : орныг
    орон<n><gen> : орны
    орон<n><abl> : орноос
    орон<n><dat> : оронд

 "он = calendar year":
    он<n><nom> : он
    он<n><acc> : оныг
    он<n><gen> : оны
    он<n><abl> : оноос
    он<n><dat> : онд

 "сэхээтэн = intellectual":
    сэхээтэн<n><nom> : сэхээтэн
    сэхээтэн<n><acc> : сэхээтнийг
    сэхээтэн<n><gen> : сэхээтний
    сэхээтэн<n><abl> : сэхээтнээс
    сэхээтэн<n><dat> : сэхээтэнд
    сэхээтэн<n><pl><nom> : сэхээтнүүд
